Utah statutes.
35A-3-502.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Civic organization" includes community service clubs and organizations, charitable health care and service organizations, fraternal organizations, labor unions, minority and ethnic organizations, commercial and industrial organizations, commerce and business clubs, private nonprofit organizations, private nonprofit corporations that provide funding to community service organizations, organizations that advocate or provide for the needs of persons with low incomes, religious organizations, and organizations that foster strong neighborhoods and communities.

(2)  "Diversion payment" means a lump sum cash payment provided to a client in lieu of regular monthly cash assistance.

(3)  "Performance monitoring system" means a process to regularly collect and analyze performance information, including performance indicators and performance goals.

(a)  "Performance goals" means a target level of performance or an expected level of performance against which actual performance is measured.

(b)  "Performance indicators" means actual performance information regarding a program or activity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 174, 1997 General Session

